Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2337.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 11, chapter 6, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 11-820.05, to read: START_STATUTE11-820.05. Zoning; wind and solar projects; use permits; voting; applicability A. Notwithstanding any other law, in a county with a population of less than five hundred thousand persons, an approval by the commission of an application for a conditional use permit, special use permit or other zoning change or variance for a PROPOSED wind project or solar project is not valid unless both of the following occur: 1. All members of the commission who are entitled to vote are present for the vote. 2. The vote for an approval of an application is unanimous among all of the commission members. B. If there is a vacancy on the commission, the commission may not vote on an application until the vacancy has been filled. C. If a commission member is absent, the commission may not vote on an application until the full commission is present to vote. END_STATUTE